src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/N-pundar28_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pundar: # Noun (28) pundar 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     pundar+N+Sg+Nom: pundar
     pundar+N+Sg+Gen: puntra
     pundar+N+Sg+Par: pundard
     pundar+N+Sg+Ill: [puntrahe, puntradõ]
     pundar+N+Sg+Ine: [puntran, puntrah, puntrahn]
     pundar+N+Sg+Ela: puntrast
     pundar+N+Sg+All: puntralõ
     pundar+N+Sg+Ade: puntral
     pundar+N+Sg+Abl: puntralt
     pundar+N+Sg+Tra: puntras
     pundar+N+Sg+Ter: puntraniq
     pundar+N+Sg+Abe: puntraldaq
     pundar+N+Sg+Com: puntragaq
     pundar+N+Pl+Nom: puntraq
     pundar+N+Pl+Gen: [puntridõ, puntriidõ, pundardõ]
     pundar+N+Pl+Par: [puntrit, puntriid]
     pundar+N+Pl+Ill: [puntrihe, puntriihe, puntridõ, puntriidõ, pundardõhe]
     pundar+N+Pl+Ine: [puntrin, puntriin, puntrih, puntriih, puntrihn, puntriihn, pundardõn, pundardõh, pundardõhn]
     pundar+N+Pl+Ela: [puntrist, puntriist, pundardõst]
     pundar+N+Pl+All: [puntrilõ, puntriilõ, pundardõlõ]
     pundar+N+Pl+Ade: [puntril, puntriil, pundardõl]
     pundar+N+Pl+Abl: [puntrilt, puntriilt, pundardõlt]
     pundar+N+Pl+Tra: [puntris, puntriis, pundardõs]
     pundar+N+Pl+Ter: [puntriniq, puntriiniq, pundardõniq]
     pundar+N+Pl+Abe: [puntrildaq, puntriildaq, pundardõldaq]
     pundar+N+Pl+Com: [puntridõgaq, puntriidõgaq, pundardõgaq]
